Rhode Island, session 2025, SB547.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-10-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-10 entitled "Operators’
and Chauffeurs’ Licenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-10-5. Special restrictions for drivers for compensation.
(a) No person who is under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall drive any school bus
transporting school children or any motor vehicle when in use for the transportation of persons or
property for compensation nor in either event until he or she has been licensed as a chauffeur for
either purpose and the license so indicates. Colleges and universities shall be exempt from the
requirement for a public plate for vehicles used to shuttle only students or employees to various
points within the college or university campus or if a college or university owned or leased vehicle
is used for the occasional transportation of college or university employees or students either on or
off campus provided that the vehicle is operated by a college or university employee possessing a
valid Rhode Island chauffeur’s license or a commercial drivers license with a passenger
endorsement. Provided, however, that the college or university shall operate the shuttle service and
there shall be no specific charge for the transportation of students or employees. The division of
motor vehicles shall not issue a chauffeur’s license for either purpose unless the applicant has had
at least one year of driving experience prior to the application, and has filed with the division of
motor vehicles one or more certificates signed by a total of at least three (3) responsible people to
whom he or she is well known certifying to the applicant’s good character and habits and the

administrator of the division of motor vehicles is fully satisfied as to the applicant’s competency
and fitness to be so employed.
(b) In addition to the requirements provided in subsection (a) of this section, any person
attempting to obtain a chauffeur’s license to drive a school bus transporting school children shall,
prior to being certified:
(1) Successfully complete a ten (10) hour school bus driver training course conducted by
the department of revenue or the department of revenue’s designee and file a certificate of
successful completion with the division of motor vehicles. The curriculum of that course and the
accreditation of courses offered shall be pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the
division of motor vehicles;
(2) Pass a written examination prepared and given by the department of revenue or the
department of revenue’s designee.
(3) Pass a driving test in a school bus of a like type which that person will be employed to
drive. The test will be prepared and given by the department of revenue.
(c) Prior to issuing a certificate to any person who intends to drive a school bus, the division
of motor vehicles shall conduct a search of that person’s motor vehicle record. Any violation of
any safety regulation or conviction of any motor vehicle law in this or any other state shall be
grounds for refusing to issue a certificate.
(d) Notwithstanding any general, public, or special law to the contrary, any current
Massachusetts or Connecticut school bus driver holding a valid CDL license in good standing in
the state of Massachusetts or Connecticut and and who presents such documentation to receive a
chauffeur's license to drive a school bus transporting children in Rhode Island shall be granted an
exemption from any requirements of this chapter relating to licensing and shall be granted the
chauffeur’s license pursuant to this section to transport school children.
(e) Licenses permitted pursuant to this section shall comply with any additional
requirements the director may require and, following the first year of employment in Rhode Island,
must comply with the provisions of § 31-10-5.1.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001892
========
LC001892 - Page 2 of 3